California statutes. Insurance Code
 various types of title policies or services offered. The classifications may be further divided to produce rates for individual risks or services within a classification. Those classifications or further divisions thereof may be established based upon any one or more of the following: (1) the size of a transaction and its effect upon the continuing solvency of the person or entity using the rate in question if a loss should occur; (2) expense elements, including the management time that would ordinarily be expended in a typical transaction of a particular size; (3) the geographic location of a transaction, including variations in risk and expense elements attributable thereto; (4) the individual experience of the person or entity using the rate in question; and (5) any other reasonable considerations. Those classifications or further divisions thereof shall apply to all risks and services in the business of title insurance under the same or under substantially the same circumstances or
 conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.4.

In order to further uniform administration of rate regulatory laws, the commissioner and every person or entity in the business of title insurance and every advisory organization in this state may exchange information and experience data with insurance supervisory officials of this and other states and rating organizations in other states and may consult with them with respect to such information and data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.5.

As a further aid to uniform administration of rate regulatory laws of this state, the commissioner may prescribe by reasonable rules and regulations:

(a) For the annual reporting of financial data relating to the aggregate economic performance of all title insurance entities conducting the business of title insurance in this state. That data, if required, shall be for the purpose of determining the industry financial experience for the reporting year and shall reflect the after-tax rate of return
 on total capital, including investment income and realized and unrealized capital gains, from whatever source attributable to operations in this state.

(b) A statistical plan, reasonably adapted to each of the rating systems in use within the state. Any plan may be modified from time to time by the commissioner and shall be used thereafter by each title insurer in the reporting of data required by the plan, so that the experience of all title insurers is available to the commissioner on an annual basis. The commissioner, through regulations, shall prescribe the form and detail of the financial data to be submitted and the time period the data shall cover. In promulgating the plan, the commissioner may give due consideration to the rating systems in use and, in order that the plan may be as uniform as is practicable among the several states, to the rules and to the form of the plan used for these rating systems in other states. Every licensed
 title insurer in the state shall be required to record and report data directly to the commissioner. The commissioner shall designate one or more advisory organizations to assist in the development of the statistical plan and to further assist in gathering data and making compilations thereof, and these compilations shall be made available, subject to reasonable rules adopted by the commissioner, to title insurers and advisory organizations. 

(c) No statistical plan or modifications thereto, or rules or regulations pertaining thereto, shall be adopted or implemented absent compliance with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that any plan, rule, or regulation shall not become effective for a period of 120 days following its adoption, and any plan, rule, or regulation shall be deemed to be a regulation required to be filed with the Secretary
 of State for purposes of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) Data gathered under the statistical plan may be used in conjunction with analytical input from an industry advisory organization to generate statistical information for use in reviewing and evaluating individual rate filings by title insurers pursuant to the standards set forth in Section 12401.3. However, no statistical plan or modifications thereto, or rules or regulations pertaining thereto, shall do any of the following:

(1) Serve as the basis for an assessment not otherwise authorized by law.

(2) Conflict with the purpose and express intent of Section 12401.

(3) Fix, determine, or in any way impair
 competitive rating or the free market.

(e) This section shall not require a title insurer to refile an existing rate. However, this section shall apply to the filing of a changed or otherwise modified rate, pursuant to the regulations adopted to implement this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 919, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.6.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit concert of action between entities under the same general management and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.7.

No title insurer, underwritten title company or controlled escrow company shall use any rate in the business of title insurance prior to its effective date nor prior to the filing with respect to such rate having been publicly displayed and made readily available to the public for a period of no less than 30 days in each office of the title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company in the county to which such rate applies, and no rate increase shall apply to title policies or services which have been contracted for prior to such effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.71.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 12401.1 and 12401.7, a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company may use a new rate prior to 30 days after the filing if the new rate results in a reduction from an existing rate, the earlier effective date is set forth in the filing, and the new rate has been publicly displayed and made readily available to the public prior to its effective date.

(b) Any rate reduction filed by a title insurer, underwritten title
 company, or controlled escrow company pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to the authority of the commissioner as set forth in this article and Article 6.7 (commencing with Section 12414.13).

(c) Five years from the effective date of this section, and within existing resources, the department shall review the reduced rates authorized by this section to determine if they are inadequate or if they increase the possibility of title insurers becoming insolvent. This review shall be in addition to any other authorized by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.8.

Charges in excess of those set forth in a rate filing which has become effective may be made when such filing includes a statement that such charges may be made in the event unusual insurance risks are assumed or unusual services performed in the transaction of the business of title insurance; provided, that such charges are reasonably commensurate with the risks assumed or the costs of the services performed and provided further that each person or entity obligated to pay all or any part of such charges consents thereto in writing in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.9.

The schedules of rates which are required to be filed with the commissioner under the provisions of Section 12401.1 shall be printed or typed in type not smaller than 10-point and, so long as they are effective, full copies thereof, showing their effective date or dates, shall be kept at all times available to the public and prominently displayed in a public place in each office of a title insurer, an underwritten title company and a controlled escrow company in the county to which such rates apply. On request, copies of such schedules or adequate summaries of the pertinent part or parts thereof shall be furnished to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.10.

Nothing in this article shall require the filing of rates by title insurers for reinsurance contracts or agreements or policies of excess coinsurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Advisory Organizations [12402. - 12402.2.]

12402.

No advisory organization shall conduct its operations in this state without first filing with the commissioner: (a) a copy of its constitution, articles of agreement or association or certificate of incorporation, and of its bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the conduct of its business; (b) a list of its members; (c) the name and address of a resident of this state upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting such advisory organization may be served.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.1.

Every advisory organization shall adopt bylaws or rules and regulations which will:

(a) Permit any person or entity in the business of title insurance in this state to become a member at a reasonable cost and without discrimination;

(b) Permit any member to withdraw at any time upon written notice;

(c) Prohibit any act or agreement by which any person or entity is restrained from lawfully engaging in the business of title insurance in this state;

(d) Require that the commissioner be given prompt notification of every change in any of the items described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 12402.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.2.

No bylaw or rule or regulation required by Section 12402.1 shall be effective until filed with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Rebates and Commissions [12404. - 12413.5.]

12404.

(a) It is unlawful for any title insurer, underwritten title company or controlled escrow company to pay, directly or indirectly, any commission, compensation, or other consideration to any person as an inducement for the placement or referral of title business. Actual placement or referral of title business is not a precondition to a violation of this section, whether the violation is or is not a per se violation pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) For purposes of this section,
 the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Compensating balance” is a balance maintained in a lending institution by any title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company for the express or implied purpose of influencing the extension of credit to a third party or the provision of goods, services, or benefits to a third party as an inducement for the placement or referral of title business by a third party.

(2) “Person” means any individual or entity who is any owner or prospective owner, lessee or prospective lessee of real property or any interest therein, any obligee or prospective obligee of an obligation secured or to be secured either in whole or in part by real property or any interest therein, or any person who is acting or who is in the business of acting as agent, representative, attorney, or employee of those persons.

(3) “Title business” means the “business of title insurance” as defined in Section 12340.3, and includes, but is not limited to, the offering of title insurance, escrow, or other services by a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company.

(c) The following activities, whether performed directly or indirectly, are deemed per se inducements for the placement or referral of title insurance business by any person and are unlawful:

(1) Paying or offering to pay, furnishing or offering to furnish, or providing or offering to provide assistance with the business expenses of any person, including, but not limited to, rent, employee salaries, furniture, copiers, facsimile machines, automobiles, telephone services or equipment, or computers.

(2) Providing or offering to provide any form of consideration intended for the benefit of any person, including cash, below market rate loans, automobile charges, or merchandise or merchandise credits.

(3) Placing or offering to place on behalf of any person, compensating balances.

(4) Advancing or paying or offering to advance or pay money on behalf of any person into an escrow to facilitate the closing thereof, other than any sum which represents the proceeds of a loan made in the ordinary course of business; or an advance not to exceed 2 percent of the sales price of the real property being sold or exchanged through the escrow or the amount of any loan secured by real property involved in the escrow, whichever is greater; or the extension of credit or an advance for the costs, fees and expenses of the escrow or of the title insurance issued or to be issued in
 connection therewith.

(5) Disbursing or offering to disburse on behalf of any person escrow funds held by a title insurer, underwritten title company or controlled escrow company before the conditions of the escrow applicable to that disbursement have been met, or in a manner which does not conform to Section 12413.1, including disbursing or offering to disburse before the expiration of the appropriate period established in Section 12413.1.

(6) Furnishing or offering to furnish all or any part of the time or productive effort of any employee of the title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company to any person for any service unrelated to the title business.

(7) Advertising or paying for the advertising in any newspaper, newsletter, magazine, or publication that is produced by, or on behalf of,
 a person, or that results in a direct, or indirect, subsidy to a person.

(8) Expenditures for food, beverages, and entertainment for a person.

(d) Expenditures for the following are not deemed to be unlawful or in violation of this section:

(1) Promotional items with a permanently affixed company logo of the underwritten title company, title insurer, or controlled escrow company, with a value of not more than ten dollars ($10) each. “Promotional item” does not include a gift certificate, gift card, or other item that has a specific monetary value on its face, or that may be exchanged for any other item having a specific monetary value.

(2) Furnishing education or educational materials exclusively related to the business of title insurance for a person
 if continuing education credits are not provided.

(3) Other expenditures for a person, as permitted by the Department of Insurance by regulation.

(e) The provision or payment of any form of consideration as an inducement for the placement or referral of title business not specifically set forth in this section shall not be presumed lawful merely because they are not specifically prohibited.

(f) The Insurance Commissioner may determine compliance and enforce the provisions of this section by written order, regulation or written consent which may take into consideration standards, conditions, guidelines, principles, or definitions utilized by other states or federal agencies but those standards, conditions, guidelines, principles, or definitions shall not be determinative.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the enactment of this section shall have no effect on the applicability of other sections of the Insurance Code that are in existence prior to the enactment of this section and which specifically, or by implication, refer to this section. The Legislature hereby intends that this section, including the specific terms employed within it, shall be liberally construed for the purpose of protecting consumers of title business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.1.

The furnishing of a preliminary report by any title insurer, controlled escrow company or underwritten title company, without charge to any person, shall constitute a violation of Section 12404. The charge for a preliminary report shall have a reasonable relation to the cost of production of the report but in no event shall it be less than the rate for a standard owners policy, minimum liability, as set forth in the company’s rate schedule. After billing any person for a preliminary report the title insurer, controlled escrow company or underwritten title
 company shall promptly make a good faith attempt to collect; provided, however, that notwithstanding Section 12404, but without limiting the applicability of that section to other transactions, this charge may be waived or canceled, if the company follows uniform practices as to all customers under like circumstances.

(a) After the issuance of the preliminary report, but before the charge is waived or canceled, the files of the issuing company contain a copy of a bona fide sales or exchange agreement, or loan commitment executed by the party or parties in interest relating to the property described in the report, and the sale, exchange, or loan is not consummated.

(b) When the preliminary report so furnished contains a lien or encumbrance or other title defect which the issuing company has refused to eliminate from its policy of title insurance or to provide insurance against loss
 by reason thereof, and another title insurance company has eliminated the lien or encumbrance or other title defect from its policy of title insurance or provided insurance against loss resulting therefrom within a reasonable period of time from the date of the issuance of the preliminary report.

The furnishing of the names of owners of record, descriptions of real property, and property characteristics, as defined in Section 408.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall not be deemed to be a violation of Section 12404, whether provided on individual or multiple properties and whether provided in printed form or by electronic media.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12404.5.

As used in this section “personal or controlled insurance” means a policy of title insurance, or insurance as to the identity, due execution and validity of any note or bond secured by mortage, or the identity, due execution, validity and recording of any such mortgage, or any other service afforded by title insurers the rate for which is required to be filed by Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) of this chapter, where the insured or one of the insured under such policy is, or the loss thereunder is payable to, an underwritten title company, a controlled escrow company, or an issuing agent, or

(a) If such underwritten or controlled company or issuing agent is a natural person: (1) his spouse, his employer or his employer’s spouse, or (2) any person related to him or the persons mentioned in (1) of this paragraph within the second degree by blood or marriage, or (3) if his employer is a corporation, any person directly or indirectly owning or controlling a majority of the voting stock or controlling interest in such corporation, or (4) if his employer is a partnership or association, any person owning any interest in such partnership or association.

(b) If such underwritten or controlled company or issuing agent is a corporation: (1) any person directly or indirectly owning or controlling a majority of the voting stock or controlling interest in such corporation, or (2) any corporation which is directly or indirectly controlled by a person who also controls the underwritten title company, controlled escrow company, or
 issuing agent, as described in (1), or (3) any corporation making consolidated returns for United States income tax purposes with any corporation described in (1) or (2) of this paragraph.

If the fees and charges for personal or controlled insurance so issued in any one calendar year received by an underwritten title company, a controlled escrow company or an issuing agent exceed the fees and charges received for other title insurance issued at the instance or request of such underwritten title company, controlled escrow company or issuing agent in the same year, the excess is an unlawful rebate. Violation of this section by a title insurer shall not be subject to the penalty provided for in Section 12409.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.

No title insurer, no controlled escrow company, and no underwritten title company shall make any rebate of any portion of the fee or charge shown by the schedule required by Section 12401.1. No title insurer, no controlled escrow company and no underwritten title company shall quote any fee or make any charge for a title policy to any person which is less than that currently available to others for the same type of title policy in a like amount covering property in the same county and involving the same factors as set forth in its then currently effective schedule of fees and charges. The amount by which any fee or charge is less than that called for by the then currently
 effective schedule of fees and charges of the title insurer is an unlawful rebate; provided, that nothing contained in this article shall prohibit bulk rates or special rates for customers of prescribed classes if such bulk or special rates are provided for in such schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.7.

In addition to other acts prohibited by this article, no controlled escrow company or title insurer or other person engaged in the business of selling or furnishing to the public, directly or indirectly, evidence to title to real property shall:

(a) Pay for or furnish or offer to pay for or furnish any part of the advertising or promotional material of the customer in connection with the sale or encumbrance of real property.

(b) Pay or offer to pay for any evidence of title or copy or contents thereof not produced or issued by such person or
 company if such evidence of title relates to a current real property transaction, except as provided in Section 12412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12406.

No title insurer shall issue any title policy in any transaction in connection with which it or any person which is a controlled escrow company or underwritten title company by reason of its relationship with such title insurer has paid or contemplates paying any commission in violation of Section 12404 or in connection with which it or any such controlled escrow company or underwritten title company has made or contemplates making any unlawful rebate in violation of Section 12405.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

12406.5.

(a) The commissioner shall develop, publish, and disseminate a brochure for consumers who are required to buy title insurance as part of a residential real estate transaction. The brochure shall inform consumers that competing title insurers and underwritten title companies may offer different costs or services for the title insurance required in the transaction. The brochure shall also inform consumers about the potential availability of discounts in cases involving first-time buyers, short-term rates if a home is resold in less than a five-year period, concurrent rates if the company is providing both the homeowners’ and the lenders’ title insurance policies in the transaction, subdivision bulk rates if the
 property being purchased is in a new subdivision, refinancing discounts, short-term financing rates, and discounts that may be available in other special cases. The brochure shall encourage consumers to contact more than one title insurer or underwritten title company in order to compare costs and services.

(b) The brochure developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the department’s toll-free consumer assistance telephone number and shall invite consumers to call the department if they need assistance.

(c) The department shall display the brochure developed pursuant to subdivision (a) on its Internet Web site, and the brochure shall include the department’s Internet address.

(d) The brochure developed
 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall also educate consumers about laws involving unlawful commissions and rebates associated with the placement or referral of title insurance and shall encourage consumers to report to the department, to the Bureau of Real Estate, and to any other appropriate government agencies any suspected incidents of probable unlawful commissions or rebates subject to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 12414).

(e) One copy of the brochure developed pursuant to this section shall be made available to a member of the public at no cost, and the department may charge its actual cost for providing additional copies. The brochure shall be made available for reproduction at no cost to any vendor who wishes to publish the brochure as written, provided any vendor who wishes to publish the brochure agrees to submit any documents
 containing the brochure to the department prior to publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 396.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

12407.

The commissioner, if he has reason to believe that any controlled escrow company or any underwritten title company has violated or is violating any of the provisions of this article, has the power and it is his duty to forthwith examine its books, records and accounts and in making any such examination he has all the power set forth in Article 4, Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of this code and any company so examined shall pay to the commissioner the cost of such examination on demand. Whenever the commissioner examines a title insurer, he shall make such examination of its books, records, and files as may be necessary in his judgment to determine whether or not it has
 violated or is violating any of the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

12408.

Every title insurer shall include in its annual statement furnished the commissioner pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 900), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 of this code, the name of each person which is a controlled escrow company or underwritten title company by reason of its relationship with such title insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 689.)
-------------------------------------------

12408.1.

Whenever a title insurer terminates its underwriting agreement with any underwritten title company, it shall at the same time give notice of the termination to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

12408.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article no title insurer, no controlled escrow company, and no underwritten title company shall pay any commission for the solicitation or negotiation of any services constituting the business of title insurance.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) notwithstanding, a title insurer, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company may pay to full-time salaried employees a commission, incentive compensation or bonuses based on any such employees’ level of production of any services constituting the business of
 title insurance. Any title insurer, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company and, where applicable their affiliates, which makes such payments shall maintain adequate records detailing the conditions to receipt of any commission, incentive compensation or bonus, the recipient thereof and the amount paid.

(c) Any employee of a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company shall not, directly or indirectly, pay or offer to pay, either directly or indirectly, any part of his or her compensation, whether denominated salary, incentive compensation, or bonuses to any person or entity defined in Section 12404, as an inducement for, or as compensation for, any title insurance business or any escrow or other title business, and any payment or offer to pay this consideration is an unlawful rebate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 972, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12409.

(a) Every title insurer, controlled escrow company, and underwritten title company which pays any commission or which makes any unlawful rebate in violation of this article shall be liable to the people of California for five times the amount of that commission or unlawful rebate, the amount thereof to be recovered by the commissioner pursuant to Section 12976. In addition to, or in lieu of, any other penalty that may be imposed under this code, the commissioner may, after a hearing, issue an order to restrict or suspend the certificate of
 authority of any title insurer or controlled escrow company or the license of any underwritten title company. The commissioner may restrict or suspend the certificate of authority or license on a statewide basis or in specified counties.

(b) In no event shall the total or aggregate amount recovered by the commissioner from a title insurer, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company pursuant to this section be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 919, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12410.

In enforcing any of the provisions of this article, the commissioner shall be entitled to the remedies provided for in Section 12928.6 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

12411.

The commissioner may after a hearing suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any title insurer or the license of any underwritten title company licensed pursuant to the provisions of Section 12389, which, after 10 days’ written notice from the commissioner requiring it to comply with the provisions of this article willfully fails to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

12412.

Nothing in this article prohibits the division of fees or charges, for work and services actually performed, between title insurers or between title insurers and underwritten title companies or between underwritten title companies, if such division does not constitute an unlawful rebate as defined by Section 12404.5, or is prohibited by Section 12405.7 or 12408.5. The entire charge made to obtain a title policy shall be set forth on the title policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12413.1.

No title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company shall disburse funds from an escrow account until the day established by the following:

(a) Except for funds deposited by cash or by electronic payment, deposits accorded next day availability pursuant to Part 229 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations may not be disbursed until the business day following the business day of deposit.

(b) Except for drafts, deposits not accorded next day availability pursuant to Part 229 of Title 12 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations shall not be disbursed until the day on which these funds must be made available to depositors under the federal regulation specified in this subdivision.

(c) Funds deposited by cash or by electronic payment may be disbursed following deposit on the same business day as the business day of deposit.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), deposits other than drafts may be disbursed on the business day following the business day of deposit if the financial institution to which the funds have been deposited informs the title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company in writing that final settlement has occurred on the deposited item. For the purposes of this subdivision, an electronically transmitted document that specifies that final settlement has occurred constitutes written notice as to an individual
 item.

(e) Where a draft, other than a share draft, has been received and submitted for collection, no title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company shall disburse funds from an escrow account with respect to the draft until the proceeds of the draft have become available for withdrawal from the financial institution to which the draft has been submitted for collection. For purposes of this subdivision, “available for withdrawal” means when the draft has been submitted for collection and payment received. Notwithstanding this subdivision, disbursement of funds represented by share drafts shall be governed by subdivisions (b) and (d), if applicable.

(f) For purposes of this section, “escrow account” means any depository account with a financial institution to which funds are deposited with respect to any transaction wherein one person, for the
 purpose of effecting the sale, transfer, encumbering or leasing of real or personal property to another person, delivers any written instrument, money, evidence of title to real or personal property, or other thing of value to a third person to be held by that third person until the happening of a specified event or the performance of a prescribed condition, when it is then to be delivered by that third person to a grantee, grantor, promisee, promisor, obligee, obligor, bailee, bailor, or any agency or employee of the latter.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (h), for purposes of this section, any word or term used herein or relevant to interpretation of this section, including, but not limited to, “available for withdrawal,” “check,” “electronic payment,” and “business day,” which is defined in Part 229 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations on January 1, 1990, shall have the meaning there given as the regulations existed on
 January 1, 1990.

(h) For purposes of this section, “financial institution” means any financial institution specified in Section 12413.5.

(i) No title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company shall be liable for a violation of this section if the violation was not intentional or resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid that error. Examples of bona fide errors include, but are not limited to, clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the recordation of documents prior to the time funds are available for disbursement with respect to a transaction provided the parties to the transaction consent in writing prior thereto.

(k) Nothing in this section is intended to amend, alter, or supersede other sections of this code, or other laws of this state or the United States, regarding an escrow holder’s duties and obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12413.2.

Any item or draft received by a title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company in connection with any escrow shall be deposited in, or submitted for collection to, a financial institution as defined in Section 12413 no later than the close of the next business day following receipt.

For purposes of this section, “item” means any check, including a cashier’s check, negotiable order of withdrawal, share draft, traveler’s check, or money order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12413.5.

All funds received in connection with any escrow conducted by a title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company shall be deposited in a separate depository account in a bank or savings and loan association or in an account in an industrial loan company insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and the funds so deposited shall be the property of the person or persons entitled thereto under the provisions of the escrow and segregated escrow by escrow in the records of the title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company. The funds shall not be subject to any debts of the title
 insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company and shall be used only to fulfill the terms of the individual escrow for which the funds were accepted and none of the funds shall be utilized until the conditions of the escrow have been met.

Any interest received on funds deposited in connection with any escrow which are deposited in a bank, savings and loan association, or industrial loan company shall be paid over by the escrow to the depositing party to the escrow unless the escrow is otherwise instructed by the depositing party, and shall not be transferred to the account of the title insurance company, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 328, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.7. Hearings, Procedure, and Judicial Review [12414.13. - 12414.19.]

12414.13.

Any person aggrieved by any rate charged, rating plan or rating system followed or adopted by a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company may request such person or entity to review the manner in which the rate, plan, system, or rule has been applied with respect to insurance or services afforded him. Such request may be made by his authorized representative, and shall be written. If the request is not granted within 30 days after it is made, the requestor may treat it as rejected. Any person aggrieved by the action of any such person or entity in refusing the review requested, or in failing or refusing to grant all or part of the relief
 requested, may file a written complaint and request for hearing with the commissioner, specifying the grounds relied upon. If the commissioner has information concerning a similar complaint he may deny the hearing. If he believes that probable cause for the complaint does not exist or that the complaint is not made in good faith he shall deny the hearing. Otherwise, and if he finds that the complaint charges a violation of Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 12401) and that the complainant would be aggrieved if the violation is proved, he shall proceed as provided in Section 12414.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12414.14.
